California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) The district may approve annexation of areas to the district pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 29500) or other forms of affiliation; however, the district shall meet its service commitments within its boundaries as they existed on January 1, 1971, before the district may expend any district funds for the purpose of extending services and facilities outside of those boundaries, except for the extension of services and facilities south of the Daly City Station to the terminus of the BART-San Francisco Airport
 Extension.

(b) This section does not preclude either of the following:

(1) Rail line extensions to other areas that may be annexed to, or in some other way are affiliated with, the district, if other than district funds are used to finance the construction and operation of the extensions.

(2) Improvements to existing district stations and yards.

(c) As used in this section, “service commitments” means the extension of district services and facilities to the Cities of Antioch, Pittsburg, Pleasanton, Livermore, and Fremont and to the northwest section of the City and County of San Francisco.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 70, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

29034.6.

(a) Not later than 1991, the district shall proceed to commence construction of an extension of its facilities to West Pittsburg, or to a point east of that location, if the funding described in subdivision (b) is sufficient and all of the following occur:

(1) The voters of Contra Costa County, at the November 8, 1988, general election, approve an additional one-half of 1 percent sales tax for transportation purposes.

(2) An increase in San Francisco Bay area bridge tolls, as proposed by Senate Bill
 No. 45 of the 1987–88 Regular Session, is approved.

(3) Sufficient funds are provided to the district from paragraphs (1) and (2) which, together with funds identified in subdivision (b), would result in the generation of at least four hundred twenty-five million dollars ($425,000,000) for the West Pittsburg BART extension.

(b) The district board of directors shall set aside at least thirty-four million dollars ($34,000,000) from district reserve funds and, if the district receives two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) from the San Mateo County Transit District as a result of an agreement between the district and the San Mateo County Transit District, the district board of directors shall set aside at least an additional seventy-four million dollars ($74,000,000) for the purposes of this section. The district shall seek other funding as may be available from state and other
 sources to meet the objective of completing construction of an extension to West Pittsburg.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the district extend its service and facilities to eastern Contra Costa County as far as the four hundred twenty-five million dollars ($425,000,000) funding amount will permit.

(d) If funds generated from the additional Contra Costa County transportation sales tax or the increase in bridge tolls do not become available to the district, it is the intent of the Legislature that the district proceed with service and facilities extension as far as available funding sources permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1259, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

29034.7.

(a) Not later than December 31, 1991, the district shall proceed to commence construction of an extension of its facilities to Dublin if an agreement is then existing between the district and the Alameda County Transportation Commission to provide funding for that extension in accordance with the Alameda County Transportation Expenditure Plan adopted pursuant to Section 131055.

(b) Not later than December 31, 1991, the district shall proceed to commence construction of an extension of its facilities to Warm Springs, subject to each of the following conditions:

(1) The Dublin extension is fully funded and ready for implementation.

(2) Appropriate federal and environmental approvals are obtained in a timely manner.

(3) Adequate funding is available from the sources described in subdivision (c).

(c) In order to meet the objective of completing construction of the Dublin and Warm Springs extensions of the district’s facilities, as contemplated by the Alameda County Transportation Expenditure Plan, the board of directors of the district shall take the following
 actions:

(1) Set aside, for expenditure on those projects, not less than fifty-eight million dollars ($58,000,000) from the district’s reserve funds.

(2) Commit for expenditure on those projects, an additional amount of not less than one hundred twenty-six million dollars ($126,000,000) if, pursuant to an agreement between the district and the San Mateo County Transit District, the district is to receive two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) as a capital contribution from the San Mateo County Transit District.

(3) Seek additional funding as may be available from an increase in San Francisco Bay area bridge tolls pursuant to Chapter 406 of the Statutes of 1988, together with funding from state and other sources, to provide not less than six hundred two million dollars ($602,000,000) to fund the Dublin and Warm
 Springs extensions as provided for in the Alameda County Transportation Expenditure Plan.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature, if funding, as provided for in the Alameda County Transportation Expenditure Plan and pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c), does not become available to the district for the full extension of service and facilities described in subdivisions (a) and (b), that the district nevertheless undertake to provide the described extensions to the extent that available funding permits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 5.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

29035.

The district may operate such feeder bus lines and other feeder services as necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29035.5.

Metropolitan Transportation Commission Resolution 3434, in December 2001, established the following Regional Transit Expansion Program for the San Francisco Bay area:

(a) BART to Warm Springs, sponsored by the Bay Area Rapid Transit District.

(b) BART from Warm Springs to Milpitas, San Jose,
 and Santa Clara, sponsored by the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority.

(c) San Francisco Muni Third Street Light-Rail Transit Project: Phase 2-New Central Subway, sponsored by the San Francisco County Transportation Authority and San Francisco Muni.

(d) BART/Oakland Airport Connector, sponsored by the Bay Area Rapid Transit District.

(e) Caltrain Downtown Extension/Rebuilt Transbay Terminal, sponsored by the San Francisco County Transportation Authority.

(f) Caltrain Rapid Rail/Electrification, sponsored by the Joint Powers Board (Caltrain).

(g) Caltrain Express/Phase 1, sponsored by the Joint Powers Board (Caltrain).

(h) Downtown to East Valley Light-Rail and Bus Rapid Transit: Phases 1 and 2, sponsored by the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority.

(i) Capitol Corridor: Phase 1 Expansion, sponsored by the Capitol Corridor Joint Powers Authority.

(j) AC Transit Oakland/San Leandro Bus Rapid Transit: Phase 1 (Enhanced Bus), sponsored by AC Transit.

(k) Regional Express Bus: Phase 1, sponsored by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(l) Dumbarton Rail, sponsored by the Joint Powers Board (Caltrain).

(m) BART/East Contra Costa Rail Extension, sponsored by the Contra Costa Transportation Authority and BART.

(n) BART/Tri-Valley Rail Extension, sponsored by the Alameda County Transportation Commission and BART.

(o) Altamont Commuter Express (ACE): Service Expansion, sponsored by the Altamont Commuter Express.

(p) Caltrain Express: Phase 2, sponsored by the Joint Powers Board (Caltrain).

(q) Capitol Corridor: Phase 2 Enhancements, sponsored by the Capitol Corridor Joint Powers Authority.

(r) Sonoma-Marin Rail, sponsored by Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit.

(s) AC Transit Enhanced Bus: Hesperian/Foothill/MacArthur Corridors, sponsored by AC Transit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 6.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

29036.

The board of directors shall refer for recommendation the plans of routes, rights of way, terminals, stations, yards and related facilities and improvements to the city councils and boards of supervisors within whose jurisdiction said facilities and improvements lie and to such other state, regional and local agencies and commissions as may be deemed appropriate by the board of directors. The board of directors shall give due consideration to all recommendations submitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29037.

The district shall not interfere with or exercise any control over any transit facilities now or hereafter owned and operated wholly or partly within the district by any city or public agency, unless by consent of such city or public agency and upon such terms as are mutually agreed upon between the board and such city or public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29038.

The rates and charges for service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by a two-thirds vote of the board and shall be reasonable. Insofar as practicable, the rates shall be fixed so as to result in revenue which will be sufficient to do all of the following:

(a) Pay the operating expenses of the district.

(b) Provide for repairs, maintenance, and depreciation of works owned or operated by the district.

(c) Provide for the purchase, lease, or
 acquisition of rolling stock, including provisions for interest, sinking funds, reserve funds, or other funds required for the payment of any obligations incurred by the district for the acquisition of rolling stock.

(d) After making any current allocation of funds required for the foregoing purposes and by the terms of any indebtedness incurred under Articles 6 (commencing with Section 29240) and 7 (commencing with Section 29250) of Chapter 8, provide funds for any purpose the board deems necessary and desirable to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

29039.

The board of supervisors of a county or a city and county, or the city council of a municipality having territory located within the district may file a request for a hearing before the district board as to the reasonableness of any rates or charges fixed by the district and as to any proposal for fixing the location of facilities by the district. The request shall be in writing and shall state the subject matter on which a hearing is desired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29040.

Upon the filing of a request for hearing as provided in Section 29039 the district board shall fix the time and place for hearing. The time fixed shall not be less than fifteen (15) days nor more than sixty (60) days from the date such request is filed. Notice of such hearing shall be given to the county or city requesting such hearing and shall be published by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29041.

At the time fixed for any hearing before the board any board of supervisors or city council eligible to file a request for hearing, not a party to the original request for hearing, may intervene and shall be entitled to be heard and to introduce evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29042.

The district, petitioner or petitioners, and the intervenors shall have the right to call and examine witnesses; to introduce exhibits; to cross-examine opposing witnesses on any matter relevant to the issues even though that matter was not covered in direct examination; and to rebut evidence introduced by other parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29043.

Oral evidence shall be taken only on oath or affirmation. The hearing need not be conducted according to technical rules relating to evidence and witnesses. Any relevant evidence shall be admitted if it is the sort of evidence on which responsible persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of serious business affairs, regardless of the existence of any common law or statutory rule which might make improper the admission of such evidence over objection in a civil action. Hearsay evidence may be used for the purpose of supplementing or explaining any direct evidence but shall not be sufficient in itself to support a finding unless it would be admissible over objection in
 a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29044.

A complete record of all proceedings and testimony before the board at such hearing shall be taken down by a reporter appointed by the board. In case an action is brought to review any decision of the board, a transcript of such testimony, together with all exhibits or copies thereof introduced, together with the written request for hearing and other proceedings in the cause shall constitute the record on review; provided, however, that the board and other parties may stipulate in writing that a specified portion of the evidence be certified to the court for judgment and in such case the portion of the evidence specified and the stipulation specifying such evidence shall
 be the record on review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29045.

Within thirty (30) days after submission of the case the board shall render its decision in writing together with written findings of fact. Copies of the findings and decision shall be sent forthwith to the petitioners and intervenors by registered mail, postage prepaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29046.

Within forty (40) days after the mailing of the decision to the petitioner, the petitioner may apply for a writ of mandate in the manner provided in the Code of Civil Procedure. The complete record of the proceedings, or such parts thereof as are designated by the petitioner, shall be prepared by the district and shall be delivered to the petitioner within thirty (30) days after a request therefor, upon payment of the expense of preparation and certification thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29047.

The district shall be subject to regulations of the Public Utilities Commission relating to safety appliances and procedures, and the commission shall inspect all work done pursuant to this part and may make such further additions or changes necessary for the purpose of safety to employees and the general public.

The commission shall enforce the provisions of this section.

The district shall reimburse the commission for any cost incurred by the commission in regulating pursuant to this section when such regulating is performed (a) by persons not on the staff of the commission or (b) by
 the staff of the commission but not funded by a Budget Act appropriation. The reimbursement shall be in the amount as agreed upon by the district and the commission and approved by the Director of Finance. If the district and the commission are unable to agree as to the amount of the cost, the Director of Finance shall determine the amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1089.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Claims [29060. - 29060.]

29060.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Indebtedness [29080. - 29081.]

29080.

The district may accept, subject to the procedures and limitations provided in Chapter 8 of this part, contributions or loans from the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, of any such transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid,
 assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation or in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any such transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29081.

The district may cooperate with and enter into agreements with the State of California or any public agency for the acquisition, construction, completion, maintenance, operation, or repair, joint or otherwise, and in whole or in part, of transit facilities. In connection with any such cooperation or contract, the State or any public agency may make public contributions to the district as in the judgment of the Legislature, or the governing board of the agency, are necessary or proper for its undertaking, and the district may reimburse the State or public agency for any such advance or contribution from the proceeds of the sale of bonds or any other funds available to the
 district, except that any agreement requiring reimbursement of contributions or advances by obligating the district to incur an indebtedness will be subject to the procedures and limitations provided in Chapter 8 of this part. The State or any public agency may also authorize, aid and assist the district to carry out any activity which the State or public agency is by law authorized to perform and carry out on its own behalf.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Investments [29100. - 29103.]

29100.

Subject to any agreement or covenant between the district and the holders of any of its obligations limiting or restricting classes of investments, the district may invest any surplus money in its treasury, including money in any sinking fund, reserve fund, or other fund created or established for the benefit of holders of any outstanding obligations of the district, in any of the following:

(a) Its own bonds.

(b) Treasury notes, certificates of indebtedness, bills, bonds of the United States, or any other evidence of indebtedness secured by
 the full faith and credit of the United States.

(c) Obligations issued pursuant to the Federal Home Loan Bank Act or the National Housing Act.

(d) Treasury notes or bonds of this State, or of any public corporation, municipal corporation, public district, or political subdivision within this State which are legal as security for the deposit of public funds.

(e) In any investment in which county funds may be placed pursuant to the general laws of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

29101.

Such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such bonds, treasury notes, or obligations, or part thereof, at the original sale or by the subsequent purchase of the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29102.

Any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held as investments by the district may from time to time be sold and the proceeds reinvested in bonds, treasury notes, or obligations as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29103.

Sales of any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held by the district shall from time to time be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Taxation [29120. - 29143.]



  ARTICLE 1. Property Taxation [29120. - 29131.]

29120.

The board may provide for the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes by the district, including the sale of property to the district for delinquent taxes, with penalties, interest, and cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29121.

The board shall, at the time of fixing the general tax levy and in the manner provided for the general tax levy, levy and collect annually until the general obligation bonds of the district are paid, or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds as they become due and payable, a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds and such part of the principal thereof, including any sinking fund installments required by any of the district’s agreements with its bondholders, as becomes due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be
 available for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

29122.

The taxes required to be levied and collected on account of interest, principal, and sinking fund of general obligation bonds of the district shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for district purposes, and shall be collected at the time and in the same manner as other district taxes are collected, and be used for no other purpose than the payment of the bonds and accruing interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29123.

The tax rate for taxes levied in any fiscal year for all district purposes other than taxes levied pursuant to Section 29121, shall not exceed five cents ($0.05) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district, except the tax rate for the first year of levy may include an additional amount sufficient to repay temporary borrowing incurred pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 8 of this part. Taxes levied pursuant to this section for maintenance and operation of rapid transit facilities shall be supplementary to the revenues derived from such facilities and shall be limited to actual requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29124.

All assessments shall be made for the district by the State Board of Equalization and the county assessors, and all taxes shall be collected for the district by the tax collectors, of the counties in which the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29125.

Each county auditor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district as equalized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29126.

The board shall, on or before the first weekday in September, or if such weekday falls upon a holiday then on the first business day thereafter, fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each hundred dollars, using as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditors, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board. These acts by the board shall constitute a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29126.1.

If in the determination of any tax rate a fraction of a cent occurs, the board may adopt a rate ending in the next higher tenth of one cent ($0.001). An excess over the amount specified in the budget, arising from the use of the tenth of one cent tax rate, is not a violation of this chapter. Any cash collected resulting from such excess or from an excess resulting from any other cause shall not invalidate the levies but shall be applied in the next succeeding budget year as available surplus unless its expenditure is otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

29127.

The board shall immediately after fixing the rate of taxes as above provided transmit to the county auditors of the counties in which the district is situated a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29128.

The district’s taxes levied pursuant to this article shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected, the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the chief financial
 officer of the district, under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes. The district may adopt the alternative procedure of tax collection and apportionment established by Chapter 3 (commencing at Section 4701) of Part 8 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and any amendments to that chapter. If the district adopts that alternative procedure, the district may thereafter abandon the alternative procedure at the end of any fiscal year of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 5.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

29129.

Whenever any real property situate in any district which has availed itself of the provisions of Section 29124 has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurers receiving it in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29130.

The compensation to be charged by and paid to any county for the performance of services under this chapter shall be fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors of the county and the board. The compensation shall in no event exceed one-half of 1 percent of all money collected for the district. The compensation collected by the county shall be placed to the credit of the county salary fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29131.

All taxes levied under this part are a lien on the property on which they are levied. Unless the board has by ordinance otherwise provided, the enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made applicable to this part, so far as consistent therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Retail Transactions and Use Tax [29140. - 29143.]

29140.

(a) The board shall, by ordinance, impose transactions and use taxes in conformity with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the purposes specified in Sections 29142 and 29142.2, subject to periodic legislative review and amendment.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) on or before January 1, 2020, that applies within the County of Alameda shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit within the County of Alameda established by that section.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1 of the Revenue and Taxation
 Code, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) on or before the effective date of the act adding this subdivision that applies within the County of Contra Costa shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit within the County of Contra Costa established by that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 369, Sec. 1.   (SB 1349)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

29141.

Any transactions and use taxes ordinance adopted pursuant to this article shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 90 days after the effective date of this article, or January 1, 1970, whichever is later.

Prior to the operative date of the ordinance, the district shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

If the district shall not have contracted with the State Board of Equalization prior to the operative date of its ordinance, it shall
 nevertheless so contract and in such case the operative date shall be the first day of the first calendar quarter following the execution of the contract.

The contract entered into by the district with the State Board of Equalization prior to January 1, 1978, for the administration and operation of the transactions and use tax ordinance shall be amended to provide for the allocation of the transactions and use tax revenues pursuant to Section 29142.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

29142.

(a) Revenues derived from the transactions and use taxes, not to exceed an aggregate principal amount of one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000), plus the costs payable by the district to the State Board of Equalization for preparatory costs and for its services in connection with such taxes and plus the costs of issuance of, and interest payments on, bonds or notes secured by such revenues, shall be used for the planning, acquiring, and constructing of the district’s approximately 75-mile system, including the San Francisco-Oakland Rapid Transit Tube and any and all works, structures, property, rolling stock, or other facilities of any
 kind which the district is authorized to acquire, construct, or complete.

(b) Revenues in excess of the amount specified in subdivision (a) shall be used for purposes specified in Section 29142.2, operational purposes, the liquidation of operational deficits, and the payment of principal and interest on negotiable bonds issued pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) To finance the operation of its rapid transit system during the 1974–75 fiscal year, the district may issue negotiable bonds in an amount not to exceed sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000) in anticipation of the revenues specified in subdivision (b). However, upon a determination by the board that the issuance of sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000) in negotiable bonds, together with other funds available to the district, provide insufficient funds for the operation of the district during the 1975–76 fiscal year, the
 district may issue additional negotiable bonds in an amount not exceeding eight million dollars ($8,000,000). The district may also issue additional negotiable bonds in an amount not exceeding one million three hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000) if the board determines that otherwise insufficient funds are available to the district for its operation during the 1976–77 fiscal year. The district shall pay the principal and interest on such bonds only from such revenues. Interest on such bonds may be funded, and paid from the proceeds of such bonds, for period of not to exceed two years from the date of such bonds. The board, by resolution shall determine the form, denomination, maturities, interest rates, and all other terms and conditions relative to the issuance of such negotiable bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

29142.2.

Notwithstanding Section 7271 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, after deduction for the cost of the State Board of Equalization in administering the transactions and use tax, the amounts collected under the ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 29140 and available for distribution shall be allocated as follows:

(a) Seventy-five percent to the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District. 

(b) Twenty-five percent shall be allocated by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission to the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit
 District, the City and County of San Francisco for its municipal railway system, and the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District for transit services on the basis of regional priorities established by the commission. The allocations by the commission to these transit operators for transit services shall be in accordance with the criteria in the financial management plan which is to be developed and annually revised by the commission in coordination with the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District, the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, and the City and County of San Francisco.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 115, Sec. 1.   Effective May 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

29142.4.

No funds shall be allocated to an entity pursuant to Section 29142.2, after January 1, 1978, unless, as determined by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, the transit operator:

(a) Is a participating member of a regional transit coordinating council which the commission shall establish to better coordinate routes, schedules, fares, and transfers among the San Francisco Bay area transit operators and to explore potential advantages of joint ventures in areas such as marketing,
 maintenance, and purchasing. The commission shall be a member of the council.

(b) Establishes, for the period for which the funds are allocated, fare levels such that fare revenues equal at least 33 percent of its operating cost, which shall be all of its costs in the expense object classes, exclusive of the costs of the depreciation and amortization expense object classes, of the uniform system of accounts and records adopted by the State Controller pursuant to Section 99243. The allocation period shall not be less than one calendar quarter nor longer than one fiscal year, as determined by the commission. For purposes of this subdivision, the two special transit service districts of the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District shall be considered separate transit districts. On and after July 1, 1981, the commission may grant, any operator which was in compliance with the 33 percent requirement prior to that date, a credit not to exceed 5 percent
 to meet that requirement on the basis of special operating characteristics of its transit system, including, but not limited to, its transfer and special fare policies. In no event shall the combined fare revenues of the three operators, excluding any credit granted by the commission, be less than 33 percent of their combined operating cost.

(c) Has complied with standards established by the commission pursuant to Section 66517.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 256, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

29142.5.

On and after July 1, 1984, for purposes of meeting the requirement of subdivision (b) of Section 29142.4, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission may consider, as fare revenues, that portion of the local support of an operator for its transit system which exceeds its base level of operating support as determined by the commission, if the commission finds that this consideration will enable the operator to maintain or improve vital transit within a coordinated fare structure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 115, Sec. 3.   Effective May 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

29142.6.

Upon determination by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission that an operator has met the conditions specified in Section 29142.4, the commission shall notify the State Board of Equalization of the percentage of the transaction and use taxes to be allocated to the operator. Upon such notification, the State Board of Equalization shall transmit to the operator, as promptly as feasible, its share of the transaction and use taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

29142.8.

(a) Any portion of the transactions and use tax revenues available for allocation and not allocated by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall be invested through the Surplus Money Investment Fund. The amount invested and the accrued interest therefrom shall be available for allocation by the commission.

(b) Any funds which accumulated during a period an operator is not in compliance with Section 29142.4 may be allocated to any operator in compliance with that section at the time of allocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 264.)
-------------------------------------------

29143.

(a) The district is hereby authorized to issue revenue bonds, payable, in whole or in part, from revenues made available under this article. Those revenues are deemed to be revenues of the enterprise for all purposes of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and the restrictions therein provided against the securing of bonds by the taxing power or the proceeds of taxation do not apply. The district is deemed a “local agency” and the planning, acquiring, constructing, operating or maintaining of the district’s rapid transit facilities, or
 any part thereof, is deemed an “enterprise,” within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941. The provisions of that law not inconsistent with any of the provisions of this article are made applicable to the district, except that no election shall be required for the issuance of revenue bonds authorized by the board pursuant to this article and secured, in whole or in part, by the revenues made available under this article. Notwithstanding any provision of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, the resolution or indenture authorizing the issuance of any revenue bonds secured, in whole or in part, by those revenues shall provide that the use of the revenues by the district to redeem bonds shall be continued in effect until the bonds are fully paid or provision has been made for their payment in full.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 54388 of the Government Code or any other law, the revenue bonds authorized by this article may be sold through negotiated
 sale conducted in accordance with Section 53591 of the Government Code.

(c) The district may borrow money in anticipation of the revenues made available under this article and may, from time to time, issue negotiable notes for that purpose.
